Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
SECTION 1.
There are appropriated to the Department of Justice,  for the biennium be-
ginning July 1, 2021, out of the General Fund, the following amounts, for the following  pur-
poses:
(1) Office of the Attorney
General and Administration ..... $ 680,628
(2) Appellate Division ..................... $ 401,704
(3) Criminal Justice Division.......... $ 18,324,749
(4) Crime Victim and Survivor
Services..................................... $ 19,882,698
(5) Defense of Criminal
Convictions................................ $ 38,650,233
(6) Division of Child Support.......... $ 50,716,738
(7) Debt service and related
costs .......................................... $ 8,375,250
SECTION 2. Notwithstanding any other law limiting  expenditures, the following amounts
are established for the biennium beginning July 1, 2021, as the maximum limits for  payment
of expenses  from fees, moneys or other revenues, including Miscellaneous Receipts, but ex-
cluding lottery funds and federal funds, collected or received by the Department of  Justice,
for the following purposes:
(1) Office of the Attorney
General and Administration ..... $ 44,886,891
(2) Appellate Division ..................... $ 26,237,909
(3) Civil Enforcement Division ....... $124,111,440
(4) Criminal Justice Division.......... $ 9,878,023
(5) Crime Victim and Survivor
Services..................................... $ 28,289,381
(6) General Counsel Division .......... $ 76,431,533
(7) Trial Division ............................ $ 48,764,413
(8) Division of Child Support.......... $ 22,749,638
SECTION 3. Notwithstanding any other law limiting  expenditures, the following amounts
are established for the biennium beginning July 1, 2021, as the maximum limits for payment
Enrolled House Bill 5014 (HB 5014-A) Page 1
of expenses  from federal funds collected or received by the Department of Justice for the
following purposes:
(1) Civil Enforcement Division ....... $ 5,443,614
(2) Criminal Justice Division.......... $ 1,253,014
(3) Crime Victim and Survivor
Services Division....................... $ 43,795,720
(4) Division of Child Support.......... $135,592,899
SECTION 4. This 2021 Act being necessary for the immediate preservation of the public
peace, health and safety, an emergency is declared to exist, and  this 2021 Act takes effect
July 1, 2021.
Passed by House June 10, 2021
..................................................................................
Timothy G. Sekerak, Chief Clerk of House
..................................................................................
Tina Kotek, Speaker of House
Passed by Senate June 15, 2021
..................................................................................
Peter Courtney, President of Senate
Received by Governor:
........................M.,........................................................., 2021
Approved:
........................M.,........................................................., 2021
..................................................................................
Kate Brown, Governor
Filed in Office of Secretary of State:
........................M.,........................................................., 2021
..................................................................................
Shemia Fagan, Secretary of State
Enrolled House Bill 5014 (HB 5014-A) Page 2